Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-119
Certified public accountant; examination
fee.

The board shall charge a fee as established by the board not
to exceed two hundred dollars for the initial examination provided
for under the Public Accountancy Act. An
applicant for the examination may be required to pay additional fees as charged
by and remitted or paid to a third party for administering the examination,
if required by the board.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 14, p. 60;

Laws 1976, LB 619, § 5;

Laws 1976, LB 961, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 278, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 9;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 16;

Laws 2003, LB 214, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 9.